en: wild garlic, ramsons, buckrams, broad-leaved garlic, wood garlic, bear leek, bear's garlic, allium ursinum
af: wildeknoffel
an: allium ursinum
ar: ثوم الدببة
az: ayı soğanı
ba: йыуа
be: цыбуля мядзведжая
bg: левурда, див чесън
bs: medvjeđi luk
ca: allium ursinum
ce: хьонка
co: allium ursinum
cs: česnek medvědí
da: ramsløg
de: bärlauch
eo: ursa ajlo
es: allium ursinum
et: karulauk
eu: hartz-baratxuri
fa: والک
fi: karhunlaukka, villivalkosipuli
fr: ail des ours
fy: blêdlok
ga: creamh
hr: medvjeđi luk
hu: medvehagyma
hy: ղանձիլ
id: allium ursinum
is: bjarnarlaukur
it: aglio orsino
ja: ラムソン
ka: ღანძილი
kk: ұсақ торлы жуа
ku: lûş
lb: heckeknuewelek
li: daslook
lt: meškinis česnakas
lv: laksis
mk: мечкин лук
nb: ramsløk
nl: daslook
nn: ramslauk
oc: allium ursinum
os: скъуда
pl: czosnek niedźwiedzi
pt: allium ursinum
ro: leurdă
ru: черемша
sk: cesnak medvedí
sl: čemaž
sq: lerthi
sr: сремуш
sv: ramslök
uk: цибуля ведмежа
ur: لہسن دُب
vi: tỏi gấu
wa: a des tchamps
zh: 熊葱

en: dried garlic
bg: сушен чесън
cs: Sušený česnek
da: tørret hvidløg
de: getrockneter Knoblauch, Knoblauch getrocknet
es: ajo deshidratado
fi: kuivattu valkosipuli
fr: ail séché, ail déshydraté
hr: sušeni češnjak
it: aglio essicato, aglio secco
lv: žāvēts ķiploks
nl: gedroogde knoflook
nn: tørket hvitløk
pl: suszony czosnek, czosnek suszony
sv: torkad vitlök, torkad hvidlök

en: fresh garlic, raw garlic
bg: пресен чесън
fr: ail frais
hr: svježi češnjak
it: aglio fresco

en: garlic extract
bg: екстракт от чесън
cs: česnekový extrakt
de: Knoblauchextrakt
fi: valkosipuliuute
fr: extrait d'ail
hr: ekstrakt češnjaka
it: estratto d'aglio, estratto di aglio
pl: ekstrakt czosnku, ekstrakt z czosnku

en: garlic oil
de: Knoblauchöl
es: aceite de ajo
fr: huile d'ail
hr: ulje od češnjaka
it: olio all'aglio
pl: olej czosnkowy

en: garlic vinegar
hr: češnja ocat
it: aceto d'aglio

en: chives, chive
af: sprietui
am: ቀጭን ሽንኩርት
ar: ثوم معمر
az: mala soğanı
be: цыбуля скарада
bg: сибирски лук, див лук
bo: ཀེའུ།
bs: vlasac
ca: cibulet
cs: pažitka, pažitka pobřežní
cy: cenhinen syfi
da: purløg
de: Schnittlauch
el: πρασουλίδα, σχοινόπρασο, άλλιον το σχοινόπρασον
eo: ŝenoprazo
es: cebollino, cebollinos
et: murulauk
eu: tipulin
fa: پیاز کوهی
fi: ruohosipuli, ruohosipulia, käärmeenlaukka
fr: ciboulette
ga: síobhas
gl: ceboliño
gv: shoushan
he: שום העירית
hr: vlasac
ht: siv
hu: metélőhagyma
id: lokio
is: graslaukur
it: cippolina, aglio d'india, erba cipollina
ja: チャイブ
jv: lokio
kk: шалғын жуа, şalğın jwa, شالعىن جۋا
ko: 차이브
la: allium schoenoprasum
lb: bratzel
li: bieslouk
lt: laiškinis česnakas
lv: maurloks, maurloki
mk: власец
ml: ചൈവ്സ്
nb: grasløk
nl: bieslook
nn: graslauk
oc: ceboleta
pl: szczypior, czosnek szczypiorek, szczypiorek, szczypiorku, szczypioru
pt: cebolinho
ro: arpagic
ru: лук скорода
sk: pažítka
sl: drobnjak
sr: vlašac
sv: gräslök, gräslöks
ta: இனப்பூண்டு
tr: yaprak soğanı
uk: цибуля-різанець
ur: ثوم معمر
vi: hành tăm
wa: brele
zh: 蝦夷蔥

en: chive seasoning
de: Schnittlauch Kräuter
es: aderezo de cebollino
hr: začin vlasac
it: condimento all'erba cipollina

en: tuber, tubers, tuber vegetable
an: tuberclo
ar: درنة نبات
be: клубень
bg: грудка
bs: gomolj
ca: tubercle
cs: hlíza
cv: паранкă
cy: cloronen
da: knold, stængelknold, rodknold
de: Knollengemüse, Pflanzenknolle
el: κόνδυλος
eo: tubero
es: tubérculo, tubérculos
et: mugul
eu: tuberkulu
fa: تجه
fi: mukula
fr: tubercule
ga: tiúbar
gd: bolgan
gl: tubérculo
hr: gomolj
hu: gumó
hy: պալար
id: umbi
io: tuberkulo
is: hnýði
it: tubero
ja: 球根
ka: გორგლი
kg: mbala
kk: түйнек
kn: ಗೆಡ್ಡೆ
ko: 알뿌리
lt: šakniagumbis
lv: bumbuļu dārzenis, gums
mg: vodin-javamaniry
mk: кртола
ms: umbi
nb: knoll, stengelknoll, rotknoll
nl: knolgroente, knol
nn: knoll, stengelknoll, rotknoll
oc: tubercul
pl: bulwa
pt: tubérculo
qu: allpapi puquq
ro: tubercul
ru: клубень
sh: krtola
si: අල
sl: gomolj
sr: кртола
su: beuti
sv: knöl, stamknöl, rotknöl
sw: kiazi
ta: கிழங்கு
te: దుంప
th: หัว
tl: bukol
tr: yumru
tt: бүлбе
uk: бульба
uz: tuganak
vi: củ
zh: 塊莖與塊根

en: eppaw
la: Sagittaria latifolia

en: root vegetable
af: wortelgroente
ar: قائمة الخضراوات الجذرية
be: карняплод
bg: кореноплод
bn: শিকড় সবজি
ca: arrel comestible, arrel vegetal
cs: kořenová zelenina
cv: тымар-çимĕç
cy: gwreiddlysieuyn
da: rodfrugt
de: Wurzelgemüse
el: ριζώδες λαχανικό
eo: radiklegomo
es: raíz alimenticia
et: juurvili
eu: sustrai jangarri
fa: لیست سبزیجات ریشه‌ای
fi: juures
fr: légume-racine
ga: glasra fréimhe
gl: raíz comestible
he: ירק שורש
hi: रूट सब्जि
hr: ulje korijenastog povrća, korjenasto povrće
hu: gyökérzöldség
hy: արմատապտուղներ
ia: legumine a radice
id: sayuran akar
ig: mgbọrọgwụ
is: rótargrænmeti
it: radice, ortaggi da radice
ja: 根菜
ka: ძირხვენა
kk: тамыр жемістер
ko: 뿌리채소
la: vegetable radix
lo: ມັນ
lt: šakniavaisis
lv: sakņaugs
mg: legioma faka
mk: коренест зеленчук
ml: കിഴങ്ങുകൾ
ms: ubi
nb: rotfrukt
nl: wortelgewas
nn: rotfrukt
or: ମୂଳ ପରିବା
os: уидагбын
pa: ਜੜ੍ਹ ਵਾਲੀ ਸਬਜ਼ੀ
pl: warzywo korzeniowe
pt: tubérculos
ru: корнеплод
sa: कन्दमूलानि
se: ruohtasšaddu
sk: koreňová zelenina
sl: gomoljnica
sq: rrënjë perimesh
sr: коренско поврће
sv: rotfrukt, rotfrukter
tg: бехмева
tl: lamang-kati, halamang-ugat
tr: kök sebze
ud: выжы емышъёс
uk: коренеплоди
uz: ildizmevalilar
vi: rau ăn rễ
zh: 根菜

en: taproot vegetable, tap-root vegetable
ar: خضروات الجذر الرئيسية
bg: Коренесто зеленчуково растение
bn: ট্যাপরুট সবজি, ট্যাপ-রুট সবজি
ca: Verdura de tija principal, verdura de tija arrel
cs: Kořenová zelenina s hlavním kořenem
cy: llysieuyn gwreidd-prif
da: Rodfrugt med hovedrod
de: Wurzelgemüse mit Hauptwurzel
el: Λαχανικό με κύρια ρίζα
eo: Radiklegomo kun ĉefa radiko
es: verdura de raíz principal, verdura de raíz principal
et: Põhijuurega juurviljad
fa: سبزیجات ریشه‌ای با ریشه اصلی
fi: Pääjuurikas
fr: légume-racine à racine principale
he: ירק שורש עם שורש ראשי
hi: मुख्य जड़वाले सब्जी
hr: korjenasto povrće s glavnim korijenom
it: radice fittonante vegetale
lv: nakņu dārzenis
nl: penwortelgroente

en: Brassica Rapa L.
la: Brassica Rapa L.

en: starchy root vegetable
da: stivelsesholdig rodfrugt
nb: stivelserik rotfrukt
nn: stiverik rotfrukt
sv: stärkelserik rotfrukt

en: carrot
af: Wortel
am: ካሮት
ar: جَزَر
az: yerkökü
ba: кишер
be: морква
bg: морков, моркови
bi: karot
bn: গাজর
bo: ལབ་སེར།
br: karotez
bs: mrkva
ca: pastanaga
co: rundonu
cs: mrkev, karotka
cy: moronen
da: gulerod, gulerødder, have-gulerod
de: Karotten, Karotte, Möhre, Möhren, Möhrchen, Pariser Karotten, Möhrensticks
dv: ކެރެޓް
el: καρότο
eo: karoto
es: zanahoria, zanahoria baby
et: porgand
eu: azenario
fa: هویج
fi: porkkana, porkkanaa
fr: carotte, carottes courtes, carottes
ga: cairéad
gl: cenoria
gn: sanaória
gv: carradje
he: גזר
hi: गाजर
hr: mrkva, mrkve, od mrkve
ht: karòt
hu: sárgarépa
hy: Գազար
id: wortel
io: karoto
is: gulrót
it: carota, carote
ja: ニンジン, にんじん, 人参
jv: wortel
ka: სტაფილო
kk: сәбіз
kn: ಗಜ್ಜರಿ
ko: 당근
ku: гӧрдкушман
ky: Сабиз
lb: Muert
li: Moeër
lo: ຫົວຜັກກາດເຫຼືອງ
lt: morkos
lv: burkāns, burkāni
mk: морков
ml: കാരറ്റ്
mn: Лууван
mr: गाजर
ms: Lobak merah
my: မုန်လာဥနီ
nb: gulrot
ne: गाजर
nl: wortel, wortels, wortelen
nn: gulrot
nv: Chąąshtʼezhiitsoh
oc: pastenaga
or: ଗାଜର
os: Уырыдзы
pa: ਗਾਜਰ
pl: marchew uprawna, marchew, marchwi, marchewka, marchewki, marchewkowa, marchewkowy, marchewkowe, marchewek
pt: cenoura
qu: Sanurya
rn: Ikaroti
ro: morcov, morcovi
ru: морковь
rw: Ikaroti
sa: गृञ्जनकम्
sc: Fostinaja
sh: mrkva
si: කැරට්
sk: mrkva obyčajná
sl: Navadno korenje
sm: taloti
so: kaaroot
sq: karrotë
sr: шаргарепа, šargarepa
su: wortel
sv: morot, morötter
sw: karoti
ta: மஞ்சள் முள்ளங்கி
te: కారెట్
tg: сабзӣ
th: แคร์รอต
ti: ካሮቲ
tk: Käşir
tl: karot
tr: havuç
ug: سەۋزە
uk: морква
ur: گاجر
uz: sabzi
vi: Cà rốt
wa: raecene
xh: umnqathe
za: lauxbaeghoengz
zh: 胡萝卜

fr: carotte nantaise, carottes nantaises
es: Zanahorias de la variedad Nantesa

en: dried carrot
de: getrocknete Möhre
fr: carotte séchée, carottes séchées
hr: sušena mrkva
it: carota essiccata
pl: suszona marchewka, suszona marchew
ru: морковь сушёная

en: cooked carrot
de: gekochte Möhren, gekochte Karotten
es: zanahorias cocidas
fi: kypsennetty porkkana
fr: carotte cuite
hr: kuhana mrkva
it: carota cotta
pl: marchew gotowana, marchew ugotowana

en: baby carrots
bg: бейби моркови
de: Babykarotten, Babymöhren
fr: jeunes carottes
hr: mlade mrkve
it: carote baby

en: carrot concentrate
da: gulerodskoncentrat
de: Karottenkonzentrat, färbendes Karottenkonzentrat
fi: porkkanatiiviste
fr: concentré de carotte, concentré de carottes
hr: koncentrat mrkve
it: concentrato di carota, concentrato di carote
lt: morkų koncentratas, dažiklis morkų koncentratas
pl: koncentrat z marchwi, koncentrat marchwi, koncentrat z marchwii, koncentrat marchwii
ro: concentrat de morcov
sv: morotkoncentrat, morotskoncentrat